Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
State-Aid Road Bonds
[Repealed]

§§ 19-9-51 through 19-9-77.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1985, ch. 477, § 20, eff from and after April 8, 1985.

§§19-9-51 through19-9-77[Codes, 1942, § 2926-51 through 2926-64; Laws, 1962, ch. 255, § 1 through § 14]

§19-9-55 [Laws, 1973, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 8]

§19-9-67 [Laws, 1970, ch. 317, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 394; Laws, 1976, ch. 447; Laws, 1980; ch. 524; Laws, 1981, ch. 455, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 3].